src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_N_INDEP_gwekishin_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     gwekishin+VAI: gwekishin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+gwekishin+VAI: nigwekishin
     2+gwekishin+VAI: gigwekishin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg: gwekishinsii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl: gwekishinmin
     gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl: gwekishinmw
     gwekishin+VAI+3: gwekishinw
     gwekishin+VAI+X: gwekishinm
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     gwekishin+VAI+Dub: gwekishindig
     gwekishin+VAI+Prt: gwekishinban
     gwekishin+VAI+Prt+Dub: gwekishingoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     gwekishin+VAI+3+4: gwekishinan
     gwekishin+VAI+3+Pl: gwekishinag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg: nigwekishinsii
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg: gigwekishinsii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl: nigwekishinmin
     1+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl: nigwekishinmw
     1+gwekishin+VAI+3: nigwekishinw
     1+gwekishin+VAI+X: nigwekishinm
     2+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl: gigwekishinmin
     2+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl: gigwekishinmw
     2+gwekishin+VAI+3: gigwekishinw
     2+gwekishin+VAI+X: gigwekishinm
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Dub: nigwekishindig
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Prt: nigwekishinban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Prt+Dub: nigwekishingoban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Dub: gigwekishindig
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Prt: gigwekishinban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Prt+Dub: gigwekishingoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+gwekishin+VAI+3+4: nigwekishinan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+3+Pl: nigwekishinag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+3+4: gigwekishinan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+3+Pl: gigwekishinag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: gwekishinsiimin
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl: gwekishinsiimw
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3: gwekishinsiiw
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X: gwekishinsiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Dub: gwekishinsiidig
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt: gwekishinsiiban
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub: gwekishinsiigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+4: gwekishinsiian
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Pl: gwekishinsiiag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: gwekishinmindig
     gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: gwekishinminban
     gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: gwekishinmingoban
     gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Dub: gwekishinmwdig
     gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt: gwekishinmwban
     gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: gwekishinmwgoban
     gwekishin+VAI+3+Dub: gwekishinwdig
     gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt: gwekishinwban
     gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt+Dub: gwekishinwgoban
     gwekishin+VAI+X+Dub: gwekishinmdig
     gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt: gwekishinmban
     gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt+Dub: gwekishinmgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+3+4: gwekishinminan
     gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+3+Pl: gwekishinminag
     gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+3+4: gwekishinmwan
     gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+3+Pl: gwekishinmwag
     gwekishin+VAI+3+3+4: gwekishinwan
     gwekishin+VAI+3+3+Pl: gwekishinwag
     gwekishin+VAI+X+3+4: gwekishinman
     gwekishin+VAI+X+3+Pl: gwekishinmag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     gwekishin+VAI+Dub+3+4: gwekishindigan
     gwekishin+VAI+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishindigag
     gwekishin+VAI+Prt+3+4: gwekishinbanan
     gwekishin+VAI+Prt+3+Pl: gwekishinbanag
     gwekishin+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+4: gwekishingobanan
     gwekishin+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishingobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: nigwekishinsiimin
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl: nigwekishinsiimw
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3: nigwekishinsiiw
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X: nigwekishinsiim
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: gigwekishinsiimin
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl: gigwekishinsiimw
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3: gigwekishinsiiw
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X: gigwekishinsiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Dub: nigwekishinsiidig
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt: nigwekishinsiiban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub: nigwekishinsiigoban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Dub: gigwekishinsiidig
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt: gigwekishinsiiban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub: gigwekishinsiigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+4: nigwekishinsiian
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiiag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+4: gigwekishinsiian
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiiag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: nigwekishinmindig
     1+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: nigwekishinminban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: nigwekishinmingoban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Dub: nigwekishinmwdig
     1+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt: nigwekishinmwban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: nigwekishinmwgoban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+3+Dub: nigwekishinwdig
     1+gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt: nigwekishinwban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt+Dub: nigwekishinwgoban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+X+Dub: nigwekishinmdig
     1+gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt: nigwekishinmban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt+Dub: nigwekishinmgoban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: gigwekishinmindig
     2+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: gigwekishinminban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: gigwekishinmingoban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Dub: gigwekishinmwdig
     2+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt: gigwekishinmwban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: gigwekishinmwgoban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+3+Dub: gigwekishinwdig
     2+gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt: gigwekishinwban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt+Dub: gigwekishinwgoban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+X+Dub: gigwekishinmdig
     2+gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt: gigwekishinmban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt+Dub: gigwekishinmgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+3+4: nigwekishinminan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+3+Pl: nigwekishinminag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+3+4: nigwekishinmwan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+3+Pl: nigwekishinmwag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+3+3+4: nigwekishinwan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+3+3+Pl: nigwekishinwag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+X+3+4: nigwekishinman
     1+gwekishin+VAI+X+3+Pl: nigwekishinmag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+3+4: gigwekishinminan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+3+Pl: gigwekishinminag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+3+4: gigwekishinmwan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+3+Pl: gigwekishinmwag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+3+3+4: gigwekishinwan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+3+3+Pl: gigwekishinwag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+X+3+4: gigwekishinman
     2+gwekishin+VAI+X+3+Pl: gigwekishinmag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Dub+3+4: nigwekishindigan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishindigag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Prt+3+4: nigwekishinbanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Prt+3+Pl: nigwekishinbanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+4: nigwekishingobanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishingobanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Dub+3+4: gigwekishindigan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishindigag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Prt+3+4: gigwekishinbanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Prt+3+Pl: gigwekishinbanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+4: gigwekishingobanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishingobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: gwekishinsiimindig
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: gwekishinsiiminban
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: gwekishinsiimingoban
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: gwekishinsiimwdig
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: gwekishinsiimwban
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: gwekishinsiimwgoban
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Dub: gwekishinsiiwdig
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: gwekishinsiiwban
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub: gwekishinsiiwgoban
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Dub: gwekishinsiimdig
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt: gwekishinsiimban
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub: gwekishinsiimgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+4: gwekishinsiiminan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: gwekishinsiiminag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+4: gwekishinsiimwan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl: gwekishinsiimwag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+3+4: gwekishinsiiwan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+3+Pl: gwekishinsiiwag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+3+4: gwekishinsiiman
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+3+Pl: gwekishinsiimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+4: gwekishinsiidigan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinsiidigag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+4: gwekishinsiibanan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: gwekishinsiibanag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+4: gwekishinsiigobanan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinsiigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5
     gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: gwekishinmindigan
     gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinmindigag
     gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: gwekishinminbanan
     gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gwekishinminbanag
     gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: gwekishinmingobanan
     gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinmingobanag
     gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: gwekishinmwdigan
     gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinmwdigag
     gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: gwekishinmwbanan
     gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gwekishinmwbanag
     gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: gwekishinmwgobanan
     gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinmwgobanag
     gwekishin+VAI+3+Dub+3+4: gwekishinwdigan
     gwekishin+VAI+3+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinwdigag
     gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt+3+4: gwekishinwbanan
     gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt+3+Pl: gwekishinwbanag
     gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: gwekishinwgobanan
     gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinwgobanag
     gwekishin+VAI+X+Dub+3+4: gwekishinmdigan
     gwekishin+VAI+X+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinmdigag
     gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt+3+4: gwekishinmbanan
     gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt+3+Pl: gwekishinmbanag
     gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: gwekishinmgobanan
     gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinmgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: nigwekishinsiimindig
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: nigwekishinsiiminban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: nigwekishinsiimingoban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: nigwekishinsiimwdig
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: nigwekishinsiimwban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: nigwekishinsiimwgoban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Dub: nigwekishinsiiwdig
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: nigwekishinsiiwban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub: nigwekishinsiiwgoban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Dub: nigwekishinsiimdig
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt: nigwekishinsiimban
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub: nigwekishinsiimgoban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: gigwekishinsiimindig
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: gigwekishinsiiminban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: gigwekishinsiimingoban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: gigwekishinsiimwdig
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: gigwekishinsiimwban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: gigwekishinsiimwgoban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Dub: gigwekishinsiiwdig
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: gigwekishinsiiwban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub: gigwekishinsiiwgoban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Dub: gigwekishinsiimdig
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt: gigwekishinsiimban
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub: gigwekishinsiimgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+4: nigwekishinsiiminan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiiminag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+4: nigwekishinsiimwan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiimwag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+3+4: nigwekishinsiiwan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiiwag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+3+4: nigwekishinsiiman
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiimag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+4: gigwekishinsiiminan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiiminag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+4: gigwekishinsiimwan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiimwag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+3+4: gigwekishinsiiwan
